Illinois, session 104th, HB2708.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 6b-4 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/6b-4)  (from Ch. 127, par. 142b4)7    Sec. 6b-4. On the second Monday of every month, the 8Director of Public Health shall certify to the State 9Comptroller and the State Treasurer the amount generated by 10the issuance of commemorative birth certificates under 11subsection (14) of Section 25 of the Vital Records Act in 12excess of the costs incurred in issuing the documents. Within 1315 days of receipt of the certification required by this 14Section, the State Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall 15transfer from the General Revenue Fund, one-half of the amount 16certified as being received from the issuance of commemorative 17birth certificates to the Child Abuse Prevention Fund and 18one-half of the amount to the Domestic Violence Shelter and 19Service Fund.20    The State Treasurer shall deposit into the Domestic 21Violence Shelter and Service Fund each assessment received 22under the Criminal and Traffic Assessment Act.23    In addition to any other amounts deposited into the   HB2708- 2 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1Domestic Violence Shelter and Service Fund, the State 2Treasurer shall deposit into the Fund all moneys donated to 3the State by private individuals or entities for purposes for 4which moneys in the Fund may be used as provided in this 5paragraph. Subject to appropriation, the Department of Human 6Services shall use moneys in the Fund to make grants to defray 7the reasonable and necessary travel expenses of victims of 8domestic violence who were members of the United States Armed 9Forces when the domestic violence occurred and who have been 10discharged from the United States Armed Forces to participate 11and travel to domestic violence proceedings. Military 12personnel may qualify for and have access to moneys from the 13Fund for the purposes set forth in this paragraph. The 14Department shall adopt rules necessary for making grants under 15this paragraph. County Veterans Assistance Commissions and 16organizations described in Section 501(c)(19) of the Internal 17Revenue Code of 1986 may receive grants under this paragraph. 18    The State Treasurer shall deposit into the Sexual Assault 19Services Fund and the Domestic Violence Shelter and Service 20Fund each of those fines received from circuit clerks under 21Section 5-9-1.7 of the Unified Code of Corrections in 22accordance with the provisions of that Section.23(Source: P.A. 100-987, eff. 7-1-19.) 24    Section 10. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 25amended by changing Sections 112A-6.1 and 112A-23 as follows:   HB2708- 3 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1    (725 ILCS 5/112A-6.1)2    Sec. 112A-6.1. Application of rules of civil procedure; 3criminal law.4    (a) Any proceeding to obtain, modify, re-open, or appeal a 5protective order and service of pleadings and notices shall be 6governed by the rules of civil procedure of this State. The 7Code of Civil Procedure and Supreme Court and local court 8rules applicable to civil proceedings shall apply, except as 9otherwise provided by law. Civil law on venue, discovery, and 10penalties for untrue statements shall not apply to protective 11order proceedings heard under this Article.12    (b) Criminal law on discovery, venue, and penalties for 13untrue statements apply to protective order proceedings under 14this Article.15    (c) Court proceedings related to the entry of a protective 16order and the determination of remedies shall not be used to 17obtain discovery that would not otherwise be available in a 18criminal prosecution or juvenile delinquency case.19    (c) The Supreme Court of Illinois may adopt rules that 20promote the use of attorneys serving on a pro bono basis to 21represent victims under this Article. 22(Source: P.A. 100-597, eff. 6-29-18.) 23    (725 ILCS 5/112A-23)  (from Ch. 38, par. 112A-23)24    Sec. 112A-23. Enforcement of protective orders.   HB2708- 4 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1    (a) When violation is crime. A violation of any protective 2order, whether issued in a civil, quasi-criminal proceeding or 3by a military judge or by a military commander of the United 4States Armed Forces, shall be enforced by a criminal court 5when:6        (1) The respondent commits the crime of violation of a 7    domestic violence order of protection pursuant to Section 8    12-3.4 or 12-30 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 9    Criminal Code of 2012, by having knowingly violated:10            (i) remedies described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), 11        (14), or (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 112A-14 12        of this Code,13            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 14        the remedies authorized under paragraph (1), (2), (3), 15        (14), or (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of the 16        Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, in a valid 17        order of protection, which is authorized under the 18        laws of another state, tribe, or United States 19        territory, or20            (iii) any other remedy when the act constitutes a 21        crime against the protected parties as defined by the 22        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.23        Prosecution for a violation of a domestic violence 24    order of protection shall not bar concurrent prosecution 25    for any other crime, including any crime that may have 26    been committed at the time of the violation of the   HB2708- 5 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1    domestic violence order of protection; or2        (2) The respondent commits the crime of child 3    abduction pursuant to Section 10-5 of the Criminal Code of 4    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, by having knowingly 5    violated:6            (i) remedies described in paragraph (5), (6), or 7        (8) of subsection (b) of Section 112A-14 of this Code, 8        or9            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 10        the remedies authorized under paragraph (1), (5), (6), 11        or (8) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of the Illinois 12        Domestic Violence Act of 1986, in a valid domestic 13        violence order of protection, which is authorized 14        under the laws of another state, tribe, or United 15        States territory.16        (3) The respondent commits the crime of violation of a 17    civil no contact order when the respondent violates 18    Section 12-3.8 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Prosecution 19    for a violation of a civil no contact order shall not bar 20    concurrent prosecution for any other crime, including any 21    crime that may have been committed at the time of the 22    violation of the civil no contact order.23        (4) The respondent commits the crime of violation of a 24    stalking no contact order when the respondent violates 25    Section 12-3.9 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Prosecution 26    for a violation of a stalking no contact order shall not   HB2708- 6 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1    bar concurrent prosecution for any other crime, including 2    any crime that may have been committed at the time of the 3    violation of the stalking no contact order. 4    (b) When violation is contempt of court. A violation of 5any valid protective order, whether issued in a civil or 6criminal proceeding or by a military judge or by a military 7commander of the United States Armed Forces, may be enforced 8through civil or criminal contempt procedures, as appropriate, 9by any court with jurisdiction, regardless where the act or 10acts which violated the protective order were committed, to 11the extent consistent with the venue provisions of this 12Article. Nothing in this Article shall preclude any Illinois 13court from enforcing any valid protective order issued in 14another state. Illinois courts may enforce protective orders 15through both criminal prosecution and contempt proceedings, 16unless the action which is second in time is barred by 17collateral estoppel or the constitutional prohibition against 18double jeopardy.19        (1) In a contempt proceeding where the petition for a 20    rule to show cause sets forth facts evidencing an 21    immediate danger that the respondent will flee the 22    jurisdiction, conceal a child, or inflict physical abuse 23    on the petitioner or minor children or on dependent adults 24    in petitioner's care, the court may order the attachment 25    of the respondent without prior service of the rule to 26    show cause or the petition for a rule to show cause. Bond   HB2708- 7 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1    shall be set unless specifically denied in writing.2        (2) A petition for a rule to show cause for violation 3    of a protective order shall be treated as an expedited 4    proceeding.5    (c) Violation of custody, allocation of parental 6responsibility, or support orders. A violation of remedies 7described in paragraph (5), (6), (8), or (9) of subsection (b) 8of Section 112A-14 of this Code may be enforced by any remedy 9provided by Section 607.5 of the Illinois Marriage and 10Dissolution of Marriage Act. The court may enforce any order 11for support issued under paragraph (12) of subsection (b) of 12Section 112A-14 of this Code in the manner provided for under 13Parts V and VII of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 14Marriage Act.15    (d) Actual knowledge. A protective order may be enforced 16pursuant to this Section if the respondent violates the order 17after the respondent has actual knowledge of its contents as 18shown through one of the following means:19        (1) (Blank).20        (2) (Blank).21        (3) By service of a protective order under subsection 22    (f) of Section 112A-17.5 or Section 112A-22 of this Code.23        (4) By other means demonstrating actual knowledge of 24    the contents of the order.25    (e) The enforcement of a protective order in civil or 26criminal court shall not be affected by either of the   HB2708- 8 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1following:2        (1) The existence of a separate, correlative order 3    entered under Section 112A-15 of this Code.4        (2) Any finding or order entered in a conjoined 5    criminal proceeding.6    (e-5) If a civil no contact order entered under subsection 7(6) of Section 112A-20 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 81963 conflicts with an order issued pursuant to the Juvenile 9Court Act of 1987 or the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 10Marriage Act, the conflicting order issued under subsection 11(6) of Section 112A-20 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 121963 shall be void.13    (f) Circumstances. The court, when determining whether or 14not a violation of a protective order has occurred, shall not 15require physical manifestations of abuse on the person of the 16victim.17    (g) Penalties.18        (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 19    subsection (g), where the court finds the commission of a 20    crime or contempt of court under subsection (a) or (b) of 21    this Section, the penalty shall be the penalty that 22    generally applies in such criminal or contempt 23    proceedings, and may include one or more of the following: 24    incarceration, payment of restitution, a fine, payment of 25    attorneys' fees and costs, or community service.26        (2) The court shall hear and take into account   HB2708- 9 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1    evidence of any factors in aggravation or mitigation 2    before deciding an appropriate penalty under paragraph (1) 3    of this subsection (g).4        (3) To the extent permitted by law, the court is 5    encouraged to:6            (i) increase the penalty for the knowing violation 7        of any protective order over any penalty previously 8        imposed by any court for respondent's violation of any 9        protective order or penal statute involving petitioner 10        as victim and respondent as defendant;11            (ii) impose a minimum penalty of 24 hours 12        imprisonment for respondent's first violation of any 13        protective order; and14            (iii) impose a minimum penalty of 48 hours 15        imprisonment for respondent's second or subsequent 16        violation of a protective order17    unless the court explicitly finds that an increased 18    penalty or that period of imprisonment would be manifestly 19    unjust.20        (4) In addition to any other penalties imposed for a 21    violation of a protective order, a criminal court may 22    consider evidence of any violations of a protective order:23            (i) to modify the conditions of pretrial release 24        on an underlying criminal charge pursuant to Section 25        110-6 of this Code;26            (ii) to revoke or modify an order of probation,   HB2708- 10 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1        conditional discharge, or supervision, pursuant to 2        Section 5-6-4 of the Unified Code of Corrections;3            (iii) to revoke or modify a sentence of periodic 4        imprisonment, pursuant to Section 5-7-2 of the Unified 5        Code of Corrections.6(Source: P.A. 102-184, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 7102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-890, eff. 5-19-22; 103-407, eff. 87-28-23.) 9    Section 15. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 10amended by changing Sections 205 and 222.5 as follows: 11    (750 ILCS 60/205)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-5)12    Sec. 205. Application of rules of civil procedure; 13Domestic abuse advocates.14    (a) Any proceeding to obtain, modify, reopen or appeal an 15order of protection, whether commenced alone or in conjunction 16with a civil or criminal proceeding, shall be governed by the 17rules of civil procedure of this State. The standard of proof 18in such a proceeding is proof by a preponderance of the 19evidence, whether the proceeding is heard in criminal or civil 20court. The Code of Civil Procedure and Supreme Court and local 21court rules applicable to civil proceedings, as now or 22hereafter amended, shall apply, except as otherwise provided 23by this law.24    (b) (1) In all circuit court proceedings under this Act,   HB2708- 11 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1domestic abuse advocates shall be allowed to attend and sit at 2counsel table and confer with the victim, unless otherwise 3directed by the court.4    (2) In criminal proceedings in circuit courts, domestic 5abuse advocates shall be allowed to accompany the victim and 6confer with the victim, unless otherwise directed by the 7court.8    (3) Court administrators shall allow domestic abuse 9advocates to assist victims of domestic violence in the 10preparation of petitions for orders of protection.11    (4) Domestic abuse advocates are not engaged in the 12unauthorized practice of law when providing assistance of the 13types specified in this subsection (b).14    (c) The Supreme Court of Illinois may adopt rules that 15promote the use of attorneys serving on a pro bono basis to 16represent victims under this Act. 17(Source: P.A. 87-1186; 87-1255; 88-45.) 18    (750 ILCS 60/222.5)19    Sec. 222.5. Filing of an order of protection issued in 20another state or other jurisdiction. 21    (a) A person entitled to protection under an order of 22protection issued by the court of another state, tribe, or 23United States territory or military judge or by a military 24commander of the United States Armed Forces may file a 25certified copy of the order of protection with the clerk of the   HB2708- 12 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1court in a judicial circuit in which the person believes that 2enforcement may be necessary.3    (a-5) The Illinois National Guard shall file a certified 4copy of any military order of protection with the clerk of the 5court in a judicial circuit in which the person entitled to 6protection resides or if the person entitled to protection is 7not a State resident, in a judicial circuit in which it is 8believed that enforcement may be necessary. 9    (b) The clerk shall:10        (1) treat the foreign order of protection, including, 11    but not limited to, an order of protection issued by a 12    military judge or by a military commander of the United 13    States Armed Forces, in the same manner as a judgment of 14    the circuit court for any county of this State in 15    accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Enforcement 16    of Foreign Judgments Act, except that the clerk shall not 17    mail notice of the filing of the foreign order to the 18    respondent named in the order; and19        (2) on the same day that a foreign order of protection 20    is filed, file a certified copy of that order with the 21    sheriff or other law enforcement officials charged with 22    maintaining Illinois State Police records as set forth in 23    Section 222 of this Act.24    (c) Neither residence in this State nor filing of a 25foreign order of protection, including, but not limited to, an 26order of protection issued by a military judge or by a military   HB2708- 13 -LRB104 08630 JRC 18682 b1commander of the United States Armed Forces, shall be required 2for enforcement of the order by this State. Failure to file the 3foreign order shall not be an impediment to its treatment in 4all respects as an Illinois order of protection.5    (d) The clerk shall not charge a fee to file a foreign 6order of protection under this Section.7    (e) The sheriff shall inform the Illinois State Police as 8set forth in Section 302 of this Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-890, eff. 5-19-22; 10103-407, eff. 7-28-23.)